Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.010

Definitions.

(1) "Community-based care" means but is not limited to the following:

(a) Home delivered nursing services;

(b) Personal care;

(c) Day care;

(d) Nutritional services, both in-home and in a communal dining setting;

(e) Habilitation care; and

(f) Respite care.

(2) "Department" means the state department of social and health services.

(3) "Nursing home" means any home, place or institution which operates or maintains facilities providing convalescent or chronic care, or both, for a period in excess of twenty-four consecutive hours for three or more patients not related by blood or marriage to the operator, who by reason of illness or infirmity, are unable properly to care for themselves. Convalescent and chronic care may include but not be limited to any or all procedures commonly employed in waiting on the sick, such as administration of medicines, preparation of special diets, giving of bedside nursing care, application of dressings and bandages, and carrying out of treatment prescribed by a duly licensed practitioner of the healing arts. It may also include care of mentally incompetent persons. It may also include community-based care. Nothing in this definition shall be construed to include general hospitals or other places which provide care and treatment for the acutely ill and maintain and operate facilities for major surgery or obstetrics, or both. Nothing in this definition shall be construed to include any *assisted living facility, guest home, hotel or related institution which is held forth to the public as providing, and which is operated to give only board, room and laundry to persons not in need of medical or nursing treatment or supervision except in the case of temporary acute illness. The mere designation by the operator of any place or institution as a hospital, sanatorium, or any other similar name, which does not provide care for the acutely ill and maintain and operate facilities for major surgery or obstetrics, or both, shall not exclude such place or institution from the provisions of this chapter: PROVIDED, That any nursing home providing psychiatric treatment shall, with respect to patients receiving such treatment, comply with the provisions of RCW 71.12.560 and 71.12.570.

(4) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal successor thereof.

(5) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and health services.

[ 2012 c 10 s 35; 1983 c 236 s 1; 1981 1st ex.s. c 2 s 15; 1973 1st ex.s. c 108 s 1; 1953 c 160 s 1; 1951 c 117 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) The term "boarding home" was changed to "assisted living facility" throughout the code by 2012 c 10. However, in this section, "assisted living facility" appears to be the incorrect term.

(2) The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Application—2012 c 10: See note following RCW 18.20.010.

Construction—1983 c 236: "Nothing in this 1983 act affects the provisions of chapter 70.38 RCW." [ 1983 c 236 s 3.]

Severability—1981 1st ex.s. c 2: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1981 1st ex.s. c 2 s 28.]

Effective dates—1981 1st ex.s. c 2: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions. Sections 1, 2, 3, and 10 through 26 of this act shall take effect on July 1, 1981. Section 4 of this act shall take effect on July 1, 1983. Sections 5 through 9 of this act shall take effect on July 1, 1984." [ 1981 1st ex.s. c 2 s 27.]